Utah statutes.
78B-6-1604.   Collection of civil penalty.

(1)  A local entity shall mail a notice of the civil penalty amount for which an individual is liable by first-class or certified mail within 14 days of the day after which a citation is issued under Section 78B-6-1603.  The notice shall contain the following information:

(a)  the name of the one or more individuals being held liable for the payment of the civil penalty;

(b)  the address of the location where the underage drinking gathering occurs;

(c)  the date and time of the response;

(d)  the name of an emergency service provider who responds to the underage drinking gathering; and

(e)  an itemized list of the response costs for which the one or more individuals are liable.

(2) (a)  An individual liable under Section 78B-6-1603 shall remit payment of a civil penalty to the local entity that provides the notice required by Subsection (1) within 90 days of the date on which the notice is sent.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a local entity may:

(i)  reduce the amount of a civil penalty; or

(ii)  negotiate a payment schedule for a civil penalty.

(3) (a)  A civil penalty imposed under this section may be appealed as provided in Section 78B-6-1606.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4), the payment of a civil payment is stayed upon an appeal made pursuant to Section 78B-6-1606.

(4) (a)  The amount of a civil penalty owed under this part is considered a debt owed to the local entity by the individual held liable under this part for an underage drinking gathering.

(b)  After the notice required by Subsection (1), an individual owing a civil penalty is liable in a civil action brought in the name of the local entity for recovery of:

(i)  the civil penalty; and

(ii)  reasonable attorney fees.

